Hawaii statutes.
§632-3 Further relief upon judgment.
Further relief based on a declaratory judgment may be granted whenever
necessary or proper, after reasonable notice and hearing, against any adverse
party whose rights have been adjudicated by the judgment. [L 1921, c 162, §3;
RL 1925, §2920; RL 1935, §4222; RL 1945, §9973; RL 1955, §228-3; HRS §632-3; am
L 1972, c 89, §1(e)]

Case Notes

Cited as authorizing the grant of ancillary equitable relief,
including relief from forfeiture of lease for breach of covenant. 58 H. 606,
575 P.2d 869.

Where the court did not adjudicate the rights of any party
because the declaratory judgment was voluntarily dismissed, section
inapplicable. 103 H. 26, 79 P.3d 119 (2003).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next